Idaho statutes. Title 69 WAREHOUSES
Chapter 2 BONDED WAREHOUSE LAW
§ 69-236. Noncompliance — Failure — Remedies of department.

Whenever it appears, after any investigation, that a warehouseman does not have in his possession sufficient agricultural commodities to cover the outstanding warehouse receipts, scale weight tickets, or other evidence of storage liability issued or assumed by him, or the ability to pay producers for contract obligations, or when the warehouseman refuses to submit his books, papers, or property to lawful inspection, the department shall give notice to the warehouseman to comply with all or any of the following requirements:

Cover such shortage;

Give an additional bond as requested by the department; or

Submit to such inspection as the department may deem necessary.

If the warehouseman fails to comply with the terms of such notice within twenty-four (24) hours from the date of issuance of the notice, or within such further time as the department may allow, not to exceed ten (10) working days, the department shall petition the district court in the county where the licensee’s principal place of business is located (as shown by the license application) for an order:

Authorizing the department to seize and take possession of any or all agricultural commodities in the warehouse or warehouses owned, operated, or controlled by the warehouseman, and of all books, papers and property of all kinds used in connection with the conduct or the operation of the warehouse business, and any materials which pertain in any way to that business; and

Enjoining the warehouseman from interfering with the department in the discharge of its duties as required by the provisions of this section.

Upon taking possession, the department shall give written notice of its action to the surety on the bond of the warehouseman and shall notify the holders or producers of record, as shown by the warehouseman’s records, of all negotiable or nonnegotiable warehouse receipts, scale weight tickets, or contracts issued for agricultural commodities, to present their warehouse receipt or other evidence of deposits or obligation for inspection or to account for the same. The department shall thereupon cause an audit to be made of the affairs of such warehouse including, but not limited to, the agricultural commodities in which there is an apparent shortage, to determine the amount of such shortage and compute the shortage as to each depositor as shown by the warehouseman’s records, if possible. The department shall notify the warehouseman and the surety on his bond of the approximate amount of such shortage and notify each depositor thereby affected by sending notices to the depositor’s last known address as shown by the records of the warehouseman.

The department shall retain possession of the agricultural commodities in the warehouse or warehouses, and the books, papers, and property of the warehouseman, until such time as the warehouseman or the surety on the bond shall have satisfied the claims of all holders of warehouse receipts or other evidence of deposits or obligations, in case the obligations exceed the amount of the bond, the surety on the bond shall have satisfied such claims pro rata, or until such time as the department is ordered by the court to surrender possession.

If during or after the audit provided for in this section, or at any other time the department has evidence that the warehouseman is insolvent or is unable to satisfy the claims of all holders of warehouse receipts or other evidence of obligations, the department shall petition the district court for the appointment of a receiver to operate or liquidate the business of the warehouseman in accordance with the law.
(6) At any time within ten (10) days after the department takes possession of any agricultural commodities, or the books, papers, or property of any warehouse, the warehouseman may serve notice on the department to appear in the district court of the county in which the warehouse is located, at a time to be fixed by the court, and show cause why the agricultural commodities, books, papers and other property should not be restored to his possession.

(7) All court costs, attorney’s fees, other professional fees and necessary expenses incurred by the department in carrying out the provisions of this section may be recovered in any civil action brought by the department in district court or recovered at the same time and as part of the receivership or seizure action filed under the provisions of this chapter.

(8) As a part of the expenses so incurred, the department or the receiver is authorized to include the cost of adequate liability insurance necessary to protect the department, its officers, and others engaged in carrying out the provisions of this section.

(9) The provisions and remedies of this section are not limited to a warehouse shortage.

§ 69-237. Partial withdrawal of commodities — Adjustment or substitution of receipt — Duties of warehouseman.

When partial withdrawal of an agricultural commodity is made by a depositor, the warehouseman shall make appropriate notation thereof on the depositor’s nonnegotiable receipt or on other records. If the warehouseman has issued a negotiable receipt to the depositor he shall claim, cancel, and replace it with a negotiable receipt showing the amount of the depositor’s agricultural commodity remaining in the warehouse. For failure to claim and cancel a negotiable receipt which has been issued by him, a warehouseman shall be liable to anyone who purchases such receipt for value and in good faith, for failure to deliver all the agricultural commodity specified in the receipt, whether such purchaser acquired title to the negotiable receipt before or after delivery of any part of the agricultural commodity by the warehouseman.

§ 69-238. Warehouseman’s obligations — Duty to deliver deposited commodities — Damages.

The duty of the warehouseman to deliver agricultural commodities deposited shall be governed by the provisions of this chapter and the requirements of the uniform commercial code. Upon the return of a properly endorsed negotiable warehouse receipt to the warehouseman, and upon payment or tender of all advances and legal charges, agricultural commodities of the grade and quantity named therein shall be delivered to the holder of the negotiable warehouse receipt, except as provided by the uniform commercial code.

A warehouseman’s duty to deliver any agricultural commodity is fulfilled if delivery is made pursuant to the contract with the depositor, or if no contract exists, then to the several owners in the order of demand as rapidly as it can be done by ordinary diligence. When delivery is made within thirty (30) days from date of demand, or as agreed upon in writing by all parties concerned, such delivery is deemed to comply with the provisions of this section. An extension of the delivery period may be granted by the department upon written request.

A warehouseman shall not fail to deliver an agricultural commodity as provided in this section, and delivery shall be made at the warehouse or station where the agricultural commodity was received, unless otherwise agreed.

In addition to being subject to penalties provided in this chapter for a violation of the provisions of this section, any warehouseman failing to deliver agricultural commodities within the time provided in this section is subject to suit by the person entitled to delivery of the agricultural commodities and may be ordered by a court of competent jurisdiction to pay actual damage or liquidated damages of one percent (1%) of the value for each day’s delay.

§ 69-239. Duties of warehouseman — Contents of records.

The warehouseman shall maintain current and complete records at all times with respect to all agricultural commodities handled, deposited, shipped or merchandised by him, including agricultural commodities owned by him. Such records shall include, but are not limited to, a daily position record showing the total quantity of each kind and class of agricultural commodity received and loaded out and the amount remaining on deposit at the close of each business day, and the warehouseman’s total deposit obligation, including agricultural commodities owned by him, for each kind and class of agricultural commodity at the close of each business day.

Every warehouseman purchasing any agricultural commodity from a depositor thereof shall promptly make and keep for five (5) years a correct record showing in detail the following information:

The name and address of the depositor;

The date purchased;

The terms of the sale; and

The quality and quantity purchased by the warehouseman and, where applicable, the dockage, tare, grade, size and net weight.

Records required by this section shall be legible and kept in a place of safety in this state. If a person operates at more than one (1) location, records of each location’s transactions must be identifiable.

§ 69-240. Director’s discretionary action.

Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to require the director or his authorized representative to report for prosecution or for the institution of civil action a violation of the provisions of this chapter when he believes that public interest will best be served by a suitable warning.

§ 69-241. Insurance — Cancellation procedure — Suspension of license.

With the existence of an effective policy of insurance as required by section 69-206(1), Idaho Code, the insurance company involved shall be required to give ninety (90) days’ advance notice to the department by registered or certified mail, return receipt requested, of cancellation of the policy. In the event of any cancellation, the department shall immediately terminate the license of such person without a hearing, and the termination shall be in effect until satisfactory evidence of the existence of an effective policy of insurance complying with the requirements of this chapter has been submitted to the department.

§ 69-242. Injunction.

Any violation of the provisions of this chapter or the rules promulgated hereunder may be enjoined upon complaint by the director.

§ 69-243. Duty to prosecute.

It shall be the duty of each prosecuting attorney to whom any violation is reported by the department to cause appropriate proceedings to be instituted and prosecuted without delay in a court of competent jurisdiction.

§ 69-244. License reissuance following revocation.

A warehouse license shall not be issued to any person whose license has been revoked within a period of three (3) years from the date of such revocation. Upon proper application for a license following three (3) years from the date of revocation, the department shall hold a hearing within thirty (30) days from receipt of the application to determine if such license shall be issued. If, after the hearing, the department determines that it is in the best interests of the public, it may deny the issuance of a license to the applicant. Judicial review of the department’s action may be sought. A change in a person’s business name shall not absolve that person of a prior revocation of his warehouse license.

§ 69-245. Director’s authority.

The director may, upon his own motion, whenever he has reason to believe the provisions of this chapter have been violated, or upon verified complaint of any person in writing, investigate the actions of any warehouseman licensed under the provisions of this chapter, and if he finds probable cause to do so, shall file a complaint against the warehouseman which shall be set down for hearing before the director upon thirty (30) days’ notice served upon such license holder by personal service, registered mail or facsimile.

The director shall have the power to administer oaths, certify to all official acts and shall have the power to subpoena any person in this state as a witness; to compel through subpoena the production of books, papers, and records; and to take the testimony of any person on deposition in the same manner as prescribed by law in the procedure before the courts of this state. A subpoena issued by the director shall extend to all parts of the state and may be served by any person authorized to do so.

All powers of the director herein enumerated in respect to administering oaths, power of subpoena, and other powers in hearings on complaints shall likewise be applicable to hearings held on applications for the issuance, reinstatement or renewal of a warehouse license.

§ 69-246. Appeals from decision of director.

The director shall keep a complete transcript of all proceedings and evidence presented in any hearing before him. The applicant, warehouseman or any complainant formally appearing in a hearing before the director for a license, or the holder of any warehouse license suspended or revoked, or any party to a transfer application may appeal to the district court in accordance with the terms of chapter 52, title 67, Idaho Code.

§ 69-247. License denial.

Any person against whose warehouse bond or the commodity indemnity fund a claim has been ordered collected or has actually been collected shall not be licensed by the department for a period of three (3) years from the date of such order or collection. License denial may be waived if the person can show to the satisfaction of the director that full settlement of all claims against the bond and the commodity indemnity fund has been made. A change in a person’s business name shall not absolve any unsettled claim against that person’s prior bond or the commodity indemnity fund.

The director shall, after a public hearing, have the right to deny or refuse to issue a license, reinstatement or renewal thereof to an applicant when it is determined that public interest is best served by that denial or refusal.

Upon refusal or denial pursuant to subsection (2) above, an applicant may reapply for a license, reinstatement or renewal after a period of ninety (90) days, at which time a new hearing will be held to review the application.

The applicant shall have the right of appeal on any decision to refuse or deny a license under subsection (2) above to a court of competent jurisdiction.

§ 69-248. Drawing checks insufficiently covered a violation.

Any person engaged in business as a warehouseman, as defined in this chapter, who shall make, draw, utter or deliver any check, draft or order for the payment of money upon any bank or other depository, in payment to the seller of the purchase price of any agricultural commodity or any part thereof or in compliance with a contract or to the department in payment of any fee, assessment or penalty, upon obtaining possession or control thereof, when at the time of such making, drawing, uttering or delivery the maker or drawer does not have sufficient funds in or credit with such bank or other depository for the payment of such check, draft or order in full upon its presentation, shall violate the provisions of this chapter. The word “credit” as used herein shall mean an arrangement or understanding with the bank or depository for the payment of such check, draft or order.

§ 69-249. Credit-sale contracts.

A warehouseman who purchases agricultural commodities by credit-sale contracts shall maintain books, records and other documents as required by the department to establish compliance with the provisions of this section.

In addition to other information as may be required, a credit-sale contract shall contain or provide, but not be limited to:

The seller’s name and address;

The conditions of delivery;

The amount, kind and class of agricultural commodities delivered;

The price per unit or basis of value;

The date payment is to be made; and

Any enhancements to the value of the contract, which may include, but are not limited to, transportation, premiums of any nature, or producer provided services, must be listed separately and apart from the price per unit of the commodity.

Title to all agricultural commodities sold by credit-sale contract is in the purchaser as of the time the contract is executed, unless the contract provides otherwise. The contract must be signed by both parties and executed in duplicate. One (1) copy shall be retained by the warehouseman and one (1) copy shall be delivered to the seller. Upon revocation or termination of a warehouseman’s license, the payment date for all credit-sale contracts shall be advanced to a date not later than thirty (30) days following the effective date of the revocation or termination and the purchase price for all agricultural commodities without a price shall be determined as of the effective date of revocation or termination in accordance with all other provisions of the contract. In the event claims are submitted to the commodity indemnity fund following a declared failure, the value determination of contracts will be controlled by the provisions of section 69-262, Idaho Code, and the rules promulgated pursuant to the provisions of this chapter. However, if the business of the warehouseman is sold to another licensed warehouseman, credit-sale contracts may be assigned to the purchaser of the business.

§ 69-250. Confidential and protected records.

Records required by the department including, but not limited to, production summaries, receiving records, conditioning reports, records relating to the payment of agricultural commodities, commodity indemnity fund and seed indemnity fund reporting forms of a warehouseman, and financial records that are required pursuant to section 69-206(6), Idaho Code, shall be held confidential and will be protected as production records according to chapter 1, title 74, Idaho Code. These records shall not be subject to disclosure unless specifically authorized in writing by the licensee or as otherwise authorized pursuant to the provisions of chapter 1, title 74, Idaho Code.

§ 69-251. Payment of purchase price.

A warehouseman shall pay to the depositor the purchase price for agricultural commodities upon deposit or demand by the depositor, but not later than thirty (30) days after deposit unless otherwise agreed by the parties in writing. As used in this section, “payment” means the actual payment or tender of payment by the warehouseman to the depositor of the agreed purchase price.

§ 69-252 — 69-254. [Reserved.]

The provisions of this section and sections 69-256 through 69-267, Idaho Code, together with any definitions in this chapter, constitute the “Commodity Indemnity Fund Program.”

The commodity indemnity fund program shall apply to entities governed by this chapter or governed by the provisions of the commodity dealer law as provided for in chapter 5, title 69, Idaho Code, referred to as “warehouses and/or dealers.”

§ 69-256. Creation of indemnity fund — Uses.

There is hereby established within the dedicated fund a fund to be known as the commodity indemnity fund. The commodity indemnity fund shall consist of assessments remitted by producers pursuant to the provisions of this chapter and any interest or earnings on the fund balance.

All assessments shall be paid to the department and shall be deposited in the commodity indemnity fund. Assessments shall be paid solely by producers who deposit or deliver a commodity with a warehouse or sell to a dealer or warehouse. A delivery of commodity between producers, none of which are commodity dealers or warehousemen, is exempt from the collection and payment of assessment. The state treasurer shall be the custodian of the commodity indemnity fund. Disbursements shall be on authorization of the director. No appropriation is required for disbursements from this fund.

The commodity indemnity fund and accruing interest shall be used exclusively for purposes of paying claimants pursuant to this chapter and chapter 5, title 69, Idaho Code, and paying necessary expenses and costs of administering the commodity indemnity fund. Provided however, that each year, accrued interest for that year shall be applied to pay necessary expenses and costs of administering the fund, regardless of the amount, to the extent of available accrued interest. In the event the accrued interest is insufficient to pay the necessary expenses and costs of administering the fund in any particular year, then accrued interest shall first be applied to those costs and expenses. The remaining costs and expenses will be paid with principal from the commodity indemnity fund. In no event, however, shall payments from principal in any given year exceed the sum of two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000). The interest accumulated by the fund may be paid to the department and to the state treasurer to defray costs of administering the warehouse and dealer program and the commodity indemnity fund. The interest accumulated by the fund and, if necessary, a portion of the fund, may be used to defray the cost of reinsuring the fund at the discretion of the director. The state of Idaho shall not be liable for any claims presented against the fund.

§ 69-257. Assessment — Rate — Minimum and maximum assessment.

Every producer shall pay an assessment to the department for deposit in the commodity indemnity fund according to the provisions of this chapter and rules promulgated by the department to implement the provisions of this chapter.

Except as provided in this subsection, the rate of the assessment shall be established by rules promulgated by the department. The producer’s annual assessment shall not exceed two-tenths of one percent (.2%) of the total gross dollar amount, without deductions, due the producer, as determined at the time of first sale, of the commodities.

§ 69-258. Collection and remittance of assessments — Principal amount held in trust — Interest earned — Failure to collect or remit assessments constitutes a violation — Interest and penalties for unpaid assessments.

The department shall promulgate rules to provide a procedure for the collection and remittance of the producer’s assessments. Any warehouseman or dealer who owes producers for the sale or transfer of a commodity, or have stored for withdrawal a commodity, shall be responsible for the collection of the producer’s assessments and the remittance of the assessments collected to the department.

Warehousemen or dealers shall remit to the department assessments collected according to the provisions of this chapter. Payments will be made no later than the twentieth day of the month following the close of the calendar quarter on a form prescribed by the department. There are four (4) calendar quarters in the year, beginning on the first day of the months of January, April, July and October. Assessment reports shall be submitted even though assessments for the period have not been collected. Failure to do so will result in a penalty of one hundred dollars ($100).

The principal amount of assessments paid by, or deducted from, payments to producers by warehousemen or dealers, are held in trust for the commodity indemnity fund immediately upon collection by any warehouseman or dealer and are not property of the warehouseman or dealer.

Interest earned on assessments prior to remittance to the department belongs to the warehouseman or dealer.

If a warehouseman or dealer fails to collect or remit assessments as required, it shall be considered a violation of this chapter and shall subject the warehouseman or dealer to suspension or revocation of any license issued to the warehouseman or dealer under the provisions of this chapter.

The department shall collect, on assessments unpaid within the time limits specified in this chapter, interest at the rate of ten percent (10%) per annum until the assessments are remitted together with a penalty of five percent (5%) each month on the unpaid assessment due until the maximum penalty of twenty-five percent (25%) is reached.

§ 69-259. Funding and limits of fund.

The maximum amount of the commodity indemnity fund shall be maintained between ten million dollars ($10,000,000) and twelve million dollars ($12,000,000).

§ 69-260. Financial difficulties — Additional bond or security required.

The department may, when it has reason to believe that a licensee does not have the ability to pay producers for commodities purchased, or when it determines that the licensee does not have a sufficient net worth to outstanding financial obligations ratio, require from the licensee the posting of a bond or other additional security in an amount to be prescribed by rule. The additional security may exceed the maximum amount set forth in this chapter. Failure of the licensee to timely post the additional bond or other security constitutes grounds for suspension or revocation of a license issued under this chapter. The licensee may request a hearing regarding the decision to increase the amount of security required or the revocation or suspension of a license pursuant to this section and may appeal such decisions pursuant to the procedure set out in section 69-246, Idaho Code.

§ 69-261. Advisory committee — Terms — Compensation.

There is hereby created a commodity indemnity fund advisory committee consisting of nine (9) members to be appointed by the director. Appointments shall be for up to three (3) year terms, each term ending on the same day of the same month as did the term preceding it. Any member appointed to fill a vacancy occurring prior to the expiration of the term for which the member’s predecessor was appointed shall hold office for the remainder of the predecessor’s term.

The committee shall be composed of six (6) producers primarily engaged in the production of commodities, and three (3) licensed bonded warehousemen or licensed commodity dealers.

The committee shall meet at such places and times as it shall determine and as often as necessary to discharge the duties imposed upon it, provided, it shall meet not less than twice per year. Each committee member shall be compensated in accordance with section 59-509(o), Idaho Code, for travel and subsistence expense. The expenses of the committee and its operation shall be paid from the commodity indemnity fund.

The committee shall have the power and duty to advise the director concerning assessments, administration of the commodity indemnity fund, and payment of claims from the fund. Every two (2) years the committee will review the maximum limits of the fund and give advice to the director.

§ 69-262. Proof of claims — Procedure — Hearing — Inspection of warehouse.

In the event a warehouse or dealer fails, as defined in section 69-202(8), Idaho Code, the department shall process the claims of producers who have paid or owe assessments as required by this chapter. Claims against a failed warehouse or dealer shall include written evidence disclosing a storage obligation or a sale or delivery of commodities.

The department shall give notice and provide a reasonable time of not less than thirty (30) days and not more than sixty (60) days to producers to file their written verified claims, including any written evidence, with the department.

The department shall investigate each claim and prepare a staff report and recommendation as to the validity and amount of each claim. The department shall provide a copy of the staff report and recommendation to the commodity indemnity fund advisory committee, and make available for review by the advisory committee any documentation upon which the department relied in preparing the staff report and recommendation. No later than two (2) weeks following issuance of the staff report and recommendation, the advisory committee shall provide the director with the committee’s written comments regarding the staff report, recommendation and payment of claims from the fund.

Following the receipt of the staff report, recommendation and the commodity indemnity fund advisory committee’s written comments, if any, the director shall issue a determination regarding the validity and amount of each claim.

The director shall notify each claimant, the warehouseman or dealer, and the advisory committee of the department’s determination as to the validity and amount of each claimant’s claim. A claimant or warehouseman or dealer may request a hearing on the department’s determination within twenty (20) days of receipt of written notification and a hearing shall be held by the department pursuant to chapter 52, title 67, Idaho Code. Upon determining the amount and validity of the claim, the director shall pay to the claimant an amount equal to ninety percent (90%) of the approved claim from the commodity indemnity fund. Prior to any payment from the fund to a claimant, the claimant shall be required to subrogate and assign his right to recover from any other source. The department may then pay up to ninety percent (90%) of the approved claim to the claimant. The department shall have a priority claim for that amount. The claimant shall be entitled to seek recovery of the remaining ten percent (10%) which was not originally assigned to the department. For the purpose of determining the amount of the producer’s claim, the value of a producer’s commodity shall be the lesser of: (a) the value of the commodity on the date the director declared the warehouse or dealer to have failed or to have failed to comply with the provisions of this chapter or rules promulgated thereunder; (b) the contract price as listed on a valid contract; or (c) the value of the commodity represented on the contract on the date the contract was signed. The value shall be determined by a survey of the available market price reports or markets of similar facilities within the same geographic location as the failed facility.

The department may inspect and audit a failed warehouseman or dealer. In the event of a shortage, the department shall determine each producer’s pro rata share of available commodities and the deficiency shall be considered as a claim of the producer. Each type of commodity shall be treated separately for the purpose of determining shortages.

The director shall not approve or pay any claim made on the commodity indemnity fund if the claim is based on losses resulting from the deposit, sale or storage of commodities in an unlicensed warehouse or dealer.

The fund shall not be liable for claims filed against a warehouse or dealer in good standing who has voluntarily relinquished their license if such claims are not filed with the department within six (6) months of the closing.

The fund shall not be liable for claims that result from losses due to uninsurable physical perils.

§ 69-263. Failure to file — Loss of claim on fund.

If a producer, after notification, refuses or neglects to file in the office of the director his verified claim against a warehouseman or dealer as requested by the director within ninety (90) days from the date of the notice, the director shall thereupon be relieved of responsibility for taking action with respect to such claim later asserted and no such claim shall be paid from the commodity indemnity fund. No claim shall be paid from the fund if a producer files his claim more than two (2) years from the date of sale of the commodity. Provided however, for those claims that are based on contracts containing no readily calculable sale value of the commodity for the producer, no claim shall be paid from the fund if a producer files his claim more than one hundred eighty (180) days from the date the contract is executed.

§ 69-264. Minimum balance — Subsequent payments.

The minimum balance in the commodity indemnity fund, which shall be used exclusively for purposes of paying claimants pursuant to this chapter and chapter 5, title 69, Idaho Code, shall be two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000). At no time shall the balance be allowed to fall below the minimum balance. The director may pay claims, on a pro rata basis if necessary, until the minimum balance is reached. If the director cannot fully pay a claim before the minimum balance is reached, he shall, when the commodity indemnity fund contains sufficient funds, pay off the claim. After three (3) years from the date a claim is approved, the fund shall not be liable for any unpaid amounts.

§ 69-265. Insufficient account balance

Payment priority. [Repealed.]

§ 69-266. Payment from fund — Debt of warehouseman or dealer or surety — Reimbursement — Accrual of cause of action.

Amounts paid from the commodity indemnity fund in satisfaction of any approved claim shall constitute a debt and obligation of the warehouseman, dealer, or surety against whom the claim was made. The director may bring suit on behalf of the commodity indemnity fund in the district court of Ada county to recover from the warehouseman, dealer, or surety the amount of the payment made from the commodity indemnity fund, together with costs and attorney’s fees incurred in maintaining the suit. In the event the department initiates an action against a warehouseman, dealer, or surety the department’s claim is deemed to accrue and relate back to the time that each producer who received a commodity indemnity fund payment incurred a loss in the facility. In no event shall a commodity indemnity fund payment be deemed to be beyond the reimbursement from the warehouseman, dealer, or surety merely because the payment may have occurred after the facility closed. Any recovery for reimbursement to the fund shall bear interest at the statutory rate from the date of failure.

§ 69-267. Claim against warehouseman or dealer — Director’s remedies.

The department may deny, suspend, or revoke the license of any warehouseman or dealer against whom a claim has been made, approved, and paid from the commodity indemnity fund. Proceedings for the denial, suspension, or revocation shall be subject to the provisions of title 67, chapter 52, Idaho Code.

§ 69-255. Short title — Indemnity fund program.